Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB779.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 161.155 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Teacher" shall mean any person for whom certification is required as a basis
of employment in the common schools of the state;
(b) "Employee" shall mean any person, other than a teacher, employed in the
public schools, whether on a full or part-time basis;
(c) "Immediate family" shall mean the teacher's or employee's spouse, children
including stepchildren and foster children, grandchildren, daughters-in-law
and sons-in law, brothers and sisters, parents and spouse's parents, and
grandparents and spouse's grandparents, without reference to the location or
residence of said relative, and any other blood relative who resides in the
teacher's or employee's home;
(d) "Sick leave bank" shall mean an aggregation of sick leave days contributed by
teachers or employees for use by teachers or employees who have exhausted
all sick leave and other available paid leave days; and
(e) "Assault" shall mean an act that intentionally or wantonly causes physical
injury[ so significant that the victim is determined to be, by certification of a
physician or surgeon duly qualified under KRS Chapter 342, incapable of
performing the duties of his or her job].
(2) Each district board of education shall allow to each teacher and full-time employee
in its common school system not less than ten (10) days of sick leave during each
school year, without deduction of salary. Sick leave shall be granted to a teacher or
employee if he or she presents a personal statement or a certificate of a physician
stating that the teacher or employee was ill, that the teacher or employee was absent
for the purpose of attending to a member of his or her immediate family who was
Page 1 of 18
XXXX 2/16/2025 12:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 468
ill, or for the purpose of mourning a member of his or her immediate family. The
ten (10) days of sick leave granted in this subsection may be taken by a teacher or
employee on any ten (10) days of the school year and shall be granted in addition to
accumulated sick leave days that have been credited to the teacher or employee
under the provisions of subsection (4) of this section.
(3) (a) A school district shall coordinate among the income and benefits from
workers' compensation, temporary disability retirement, and district payroll
and benefits so that there is no loss of income or benefits to a teacher or
employee for work time lost because of an assault while performing the
teacher's or employee's assigned duties for a period of:
1. Sixty (60) school days after an assault; and
2. Up to one (1) year after an[the] assault that causes a physical injury so
significant that the victim is determined to be incapable of performing
the duties of his or her job, as certified by a physician or surgeon duly
qualified under KRS Chapter 342.
(b) In the event a teacher or employee suffers an assault while performing his or
her assigned duties[ that results in injuries that qualify the teacher or
employee for workers' compensation benefits], the district shall provide leave
to the teacher or employee[ for up to one (1) year after the assault] with no
loss of income or benefits for:
1. Sixty (60) school days after an assault; and
2. Up to one (1) year after an assault that causes a physical injury so
significant that the victim is determined to be incapable of performing
the duties of his or her job, as certified by a physician or surgeon duly
qualified under KRS Chapter 342.
(c) Leave provided in accordance with paragraph (b) of this subsection shall be
subject to[ under] the following conditions:
Page 2 of 18
XXXX 2/16/2025 12:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 468
1.[(a)] The district shall pay the salary of the teacher or employee
between the time of the assault and the time the teacher's or employee's
workers' compensation income benefits take effect, or the time the leave
is exhausted[teacher or employee is certified to return to work by a
physician or surgeon duly qualified under KRS Chapter 342], whichever
is sooner;
2.[(b)] The district shall pay, for the entire duration of leave[up to one
(1) year from the time of the assault], the difference between the salary
of the teacher or employee and any workers' compensation income
benefits received by the teacher or employee resulting from the assault.
Payments by the district shall include payments for intermittent work
time missed as a result of the assault during the leave[one (1) year]
period.[ If the teacher's or employee's workers' compensation income
benefits cease during the one (1) year period after the assault, the district
shall also cease to make payments under this paragraph];
3.[(c)] The Commonwealth, through the Kentucky Department of
Education, shall make the employer's health insurance contribution
during the period that the district makes payments under subparagraphs
1. and 2.[paragraphs (a) and (b)] of this paragraph[subsection];
4.[(d)] The Commonwealth, through the Kentucky Department of
Education, shall make the employer's contribution to the retirement
system in which the teacher or employee is a member during the period
that the district makes payments under subparagraphs 1. and
2.[paragraphs (a) and (b)] of this paragraph[subsection];[ and]
5.[(e)] Payments to a teacher or employee under subparagraphs 1. and
2.[paragraphs (a) and (b)] of this paragraph[subsection] shall be
coordinated with workers' compensation benefits under KRS Chapter
Page 3 of 18
XXXX 2/16/2025 12:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 468
342, disability retirement benefits for teachers under KRS 161.661 to
161.663, and disability retirement benefits for employees under KRS
61.600 to 61.621 and 78.5522, 78.5524, 78.5526, 78.5528, and 78.5530
so that the teacher or employee receives income equivalent to his or her
full contracted salary, but in no event shall the combined payments
exceed one hundred percent (100%) of the teacher's or employee's full
contracted salary; and
6. The district shall pay for the costs of counseling services for the
teacher or employee at the licensed or certified mental health
professional of the teacher's or employee's choosing for the duration
of the leave period.
(4) Days of sick leave not taken by an employee or a teacher during any school year
shall accumulate without limitation and be credited to that employee or teacher.
Accumulated sick leave may be taken in any school year. Any district board of
education may, in its discretion, allow employees or teachers in its common school
system sick leave in excess of the number of days prescribed in this section and
may allow school district employees and teachers to use up to three (3) days' sick
leave per school year for emergency leave pursuant to KRS 161.152(3). Any
accumulated sick leave days credited to an employee or a teacher shall remain so
credited in the event he or she transfers his or her place of employment from one (1)
school district to another within the state or to the Kentucky Department of
Education or transfers from the Department of Education to a school district.
(5) Accumulated days of sick leave shall be granted to a teacher or employee if, prior to
the opening day of the school year, a statement or a certificate of a physician is
presented to the district board of education, stating that the teacher or employee is
unable to commence his or her duties on the opening day of the school year, but
will be able to assume his or her duties within a period of time that the board
Page 4 of 18
XXXX 2/16/2025 12:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 468
determines to be reasonable.
(6) Any school teacher or employee may repurchase previously used sick leave days
with the concurrence of the local school board by paying to the district an amount
equal to the total of all costs associated with the used sick leave.
(7) A district board of education may adopt a plan for a sick leave bank. The plan may
include limitations upon the number of days a teacher or employee may annually
contribute to the bank and limitations upon the number of days a teacher or
employee may annually draw from the bank. Only those teachers or employees who
contribute to the bank may draw upon the bank. Days contributed will be deducted
from the days available to the contributing teacher or employee. The sick leave
bank shall be administered in accordance with a policy adopted by the board of
education.
(8) (a) A district board of education shall establish a sick leave donation program to
permit teachers or employees to voluntarily contribute sick leave to teachers
or employees in the same school district who are in need of an extended
absence from school. A teacher or employee who has accrued more than
fifteen (15) days' sick leave may request the board of education to transfer a
designated amount of sick leave to another teacher or employee who is
authorized to receive the sick leave donated. A teacher or employee may not
request an amount of sick leave be donated that reduces his or her sick leave
balance to less than fifteen (15) days.
(b) A teacher or employee may receive donations of sick leave if:
1. a. The teacher or employee or a member of his or her immediate
family suffers from a medically certified illness, injury,
impairment, or physical or mental condition that has caused or is
likely to cause the teacher or employee to be absent for at least ten
(10) days; or
Page 5 of 18
XXXX 2/16/2025 12:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 468
b. The teacher or employee suffers from a catastrophic loss to his or
her personal or real property, due to either a natural disaster or fire,
that either has caused or will likely cause the employee to be
absent for at least ten (10) consecutive working days;
2. The teacher's or employee's need for the absence and use of leave are
certified by a licensed physician for leave requested under subparagraph
1.a. of this subsection;
3. The teacher or employee has exhausted his or her accumulated sick
leave, personal leave, and any other leave granted by the school district;
and
4. The teacher or employee has complied with the school district's policies
governing the use of sick leave.
(c) While a teacher or employee is on sick leave provided by this section, he or
she shall be considered a school district employee, and his or her salary,
wages, and other employee benefits shall not be affected.
(d) Any sick leave that remains unused, is not needed by a teacher or employee,
and will not be needed in the future shall be returned to the teacher or
employee donating the sick leave.
(e) The board of education shall adopt policies and procedures necessary to
implement the sick leave donation program.
(9) A teacher or employee may use up to thirty (30) days of sick leave following the
birth or adoption of a child or children. Additional days may be used when the need
is verified by a physician's statement.
(10) (a) [After July 1, 1982, ]A district board of education may compensate, at the
time of retirement or upon the death of a member in active contributing status
at the time of death who was eligible to retire by reason of service, an
employee or a teacher, or the estate of an employee or teacher, for each
Page 6 of 18
XXXX 2/16/2025 12:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 468
unused sick leave day. The rate of compensation for each unused sick leave
day shall be based on a percentage of the daily salary rate calculated from the
employee's or teacher's last annual salary, not to exceed thirty percent (30%).
(b) Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, payment for unused
sick leave days under this subsection shall be incorporated into the annual
salary of the final year of service for inclusion in the calculation of the
employee's or teacher's retirement allowance only at the time of his or her
initial retirement, provided that the member makes the regular retirement
contribution for members on the sick leave payment. The accumulation of
these days includes unused sick leave days held by the employee or teacher at
the time of implementation of the program.
(c) For a teacher or employee who becomes a nonuniversity member of the
Teachers' Retirement System on or after January 1, 2022, as provided by KRS
161.220, payment for unused sick leave days under this subsection shall not
be incorporated into the annual compensation used to calculate the teacher's or
employee's retirement allowance in the foundational benefit component as
described by KRS 161.633 but may be deposited into the nonuniversity
member's supplemental benefit component as provided by KRS 161.635.
(d) For a teacher or employee who begins employment with a local school district
on or after July 1, 2008, the maximum amount of unused sick leave days a
district board of education may recognize in calculating the payment of
compensation to the teacher or employee under this subsection shall not
exceed three hundred (300) days.
(11) Any statute to the contrary notwithstanding, employees and teachers who
transferred from the Department of Education to a school district, from a school
district to the Department of Education, or from one (1) school district to another
school district after July 15, 1981, shall receive credit for any unused sick leave to
Page 7 of 18
XXXX 2/16/2025 12:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 468
which the employee or teacher was entitled on the date of transfer. This credit shall
be for the purposes set forth in subsection (10) of this section.
(12) The death benefit provided in subsection (10) of this section may be cited as the
Baughn Benefit.
Section 2. KRS 158.150 is amended to read as follows:
(1) All students admitted to the common schools shall comply with the lawful
regulations for the government of the schools:
(a) Willful disobedience or defiance of the authority of the teachers or
administrators, use of profanity or vulgarity, or assault[ or battery or abuse] of
other students, the threat of force or violence, the use or possession of alcohol
or drugs, stealing or destruction or defacing of school property or personal
property of students, the carrying or use of weapons or dangerous instruments,
or other incorrigible bad conduct on school property, as well as off school
property at school-sponsored activities, constitutes cause for suspension or
expulsion from school; and
(b) Assault[ or battery or abuse] of school personnel; stealing or willfully or
wantonly defacing, destroying, or damaging the personal property of school
personnel on school property, off school property, or at school-sponsored
activities constitutes cause for suspension or expulsion from school.
(2) (a) Each local board of education shall adopt a policy requiring the expulsion
from school for a period of at least twelve (12) months for a student who is
determined by the board:
1. [Is determined by the board ]Through clear and convincing evidence to
have made threats that pose a danger to the well-being of students,
faculty, or staff of the district; [or]
2. [Is determined by the board ]To have brought a weapon to a school
under its jurisdiction. In determining whether a student has brought a
Page 8 of 18
XXXX 2/16/2025 12:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 468
weapon to school, a local board of education shall use the definition of
"unlawful possession of a weapon on school property" stated in KRS
527.070;
3. To have physically assaulted educational personnel at a school or
school function under the board's jurisdiction; or
4. To have physically assaulted educational personnel off school
property and the incident is likely to substantially disrupt the
educational process.
(b) The board shall also adopt a policy requiring disciplinary actions, up to and
including expulsion from school, for a student who is determined by the board
to have:
1. Possessed prescription drugs or controlled substances for the purpose of
sale or distribution at a school under the board's jurisdiction;
2. Physically assaulted[ or battered or abused educational personnel or]
other students at a school or school function under the board's
jurisdiction; or
3. Physically assaulted[, battered, or abused educational personnel or]
other students off school property and the incident is likely to
substantially disrupt the educational process.
(3) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the board may
modify the expulsion requirement and length for students on a case-by-case
basis, except the length of expulsion shall be at least twelve (12) months for a
violation set forth in subsection (2)(a) of this section.
(b) In the case of students who have violated subsection (2)(a)3. or 4. of this
section, the board shall not modify the expulsion requirement or length
unless the victim of the assault consents to the modification. The victim may
issue conditional consent, the terms of which, if ratified by the board by
Page 9 of 18
XXXX 2/16/2025 12:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 468
virtue of issuing a modification, shall be honored until the student ceases to
be enrolled in the school or the victim ceases to be employed at the school,
whichever occurs first. A school district shall not retaliate against a victim,
coerce a victim to consent to a modification, or otherwise exercise undue
influence over the terms of that consent.
(c)[(b)] Nothing in this section shall prohibit a board from expelling a student
for longer than twelve (12) months.
(d)[(c)] A board that has expelled a student from the student's regular school
setting shall provide or ensure that educational services are provided to the
student in an appropriate alternative program or setting, unless the board has
made a determination, on the record, supported by clear and convincing
evidence, that the expelled student posed a threat to the safety of other
students or school staff and could not be placed into a state-funded agency
program. Behavior which constitutes a threat shall include but not be limited
to the physical assault[, battery, or abuse] of others; the threat of physical
force; being under the influence of drugs or alcohol; the use, possession, sale,
or transfer of drugs or alcohol; the carrying, possessing, or transfer of
weapons or dangerous instruments; and any other behavior which may
endanger the safety of others. Other intervention services as indicated for each
student may be provided by the board or by agreement with the appropriate
state or community agency. A state agency that provides the service shall be
responsible for the cost.
(e)[(d)] 1. In lieu of expelling a student, or upon the expiration of a student's
expulsion, a superintendent may place a student into an alternative
program or setting if the superintendent determines placement of the
student in his or her regular school setting is likely to substantially
disrupt the education process or constitutes a threat to the safety of other
Page 10 of 18
XXXX 2/16/2025 12:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 468
students or school staff. The action shall not be taken until the parent,
guardian, or other person having legal custody or control of the student
has had an opportunity to have a hearing before the board or an appeals
committee as described in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph.
2. The board may adopt a policy to establish an appeals committee and
delegate the authority to hear appeals made under this paragraph to that
committee.
3. The alternative program or setting may be provided virtually.
4. Notwithstanding any other statute or administrative regulation to the
contrary, students placed in an alternative program or setting under this
paragraph shall be counted in attendance and membership for state
funding purposes in the same manner as other students participating in
alternative programs of the district.
5. Students placed in an alternative program or setting under this paragraph
shall be subject to compulsory attendance requirements under KRS
Chapter 159 and applicable local board policy.
6. Following the initial alternative placement of a student under this
paragraph, the board shall review the alternative program or setting
placement at least once per year and determine if the placement should
be continued in accordance with subparagraph 1. of this paragraph.
(4) For purposes of this subsection, "charges" means substantiated behavior that falls
within the grounds for suspension or expulsion enumerated in subsection (1) of this
section, including behavior committed by a student while enrolled in a private or
public school, or in a school within another state. A school board may adopt a
policy providing that, if a student is suspended or expelled for any reason or faces
charges that may lead to suspension or expulsion but withdraws prior to a hearing
from any public or private school in this or any other state, the receiving district
Page 11 of 18
XXXX 2/16/2025 12:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 468
may review the details of the charges, suspension, or expulsion and determine if the
student will be admitted, and if so, what conditions may be imposed upon the
admission, which may include placement of the student into an alternative program
or setting as described in subsection (3)(e)[(d)] of this section.
(5) (a) School administrators, teachers, or other school personnel may immediately
remove or cause to be removed threatening or violent students from a
classroom setting or from the district transportation system pending any
further disciplinary action that may occur. Each board of education shall adopt
a policy to assure the implementation of this section and to assure the safety
of the students and staff.
(b) Except as described in subsection (10) of this section:
1. A principal may establish procedures for a student's removal from and
reentry to the classroom when the student's behavior disrupts the
classroom environment and education process or the student challenges
the authority of a supervising adult. In addition to removal, the student
shall be subject to further discipline for the behavior consistent with the
school's code of conduct.
2. A student who is removed from the same classroom three (3) times
within a thirty (30) day period shall be considered chronically disruptive
and may be suspended from school in accordance with this section, and
no other basis for suspension shall be deemed necessary.
3. At any time during the school year, for a student who has been removed
from the classroom under this paragraph, a principal may require a
review of the classroom issues with the teacher and the parent, guardian,
or other person having legal custody or control of the student and
determine a course of action for the teacher and student regarding the
student's continued placement in the classroom.
Page 12 of 18
XXXX 2/16/2025 12:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 468
4. At any time during the school year, a principal may permanently remove
a student from a classroom for the remainder of the school year if the
principal determines the student's continued placement in the classroom
will chronically disrupt the education process for other students.
5. When a student is removed from a classroom under this paragraph
temporarily or permanently, the principal shall determine the placement
of the student in lieu of that classroom, which may include but is not
limited to:
a. Another classroom in that school; or
b. An alternative program or setting, which may be provided
virtually, as approved by the superintendent.
6. Any permanent action by a principal under this paragraph shall be
subject to an appeal process in accordance with a policy adopted by the
board.
7. Policies compliant with this paragraph shall be included in the code of
behavior and discipline adopted by the board of education under KRS
158.148 and the policies adopted by the school council under KRS
160.345.
(6) A student shall not be suspended from the common schools until after at least the
following due process procedures have been provided:
(a) The student has been given oral or written notice of the charge or charges
against him or her which constitute cause for suspension;
(b) The student has been given an explanation of the evidence of the charge or
charges if the student denies them; and
(c) The student has been given an opportunity to present his or her own version of
the facts relating to the charge or charges.
These due process procedures shall precede any suspension from the common
Page 13 of 18
XXXX 2/16/2025 12:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 468
schools unless immediate suspension is essential to protect persons or property or to
avoid disruption of the ongoing academic process. In such cases, the due process
procedures outlined above shall follow the suspension as soon as practicable, but no
later than three (3) school days after the suspension.
(7) (a) The superintendent, principal, assistant principal, or head teacher of any
school may suspend a student but shall report the action in writing
immediately to the superintendent and to the parent, guardian, or other person
having legal custody or control of the student.
(b) 1. The board of education of any school district may expel or extend the
expulsion of any student for misconduct as described in subsection (1)
of this section, but the action shall not be taken until the parent,
guardian, or other person having legal custody or control of the student
has had an opportunity to have a hearing before the board. The decision
of the board shall be final.
2. Within thirty (30) days prior to the end of a student's expulsion, the
board shall review the details of the expulsion and current factors and
circumstances, including if ending the expulsion will substantially
disrupt the education process or constitute a threat to the safety of
students or school staff, to determine if the expulsion shall be extended
for a period not to exceed twelve (12) months.
3. The expulsion review process shall be used prior to the end of each
expulsion period until the board ends the expulsion or the student is no
longer subject to compulsory attendance under KRS 159.010.
4. Each board of education shall adopt a policy for implementation of the
process described in this paragraph.
(8) (a) Suspension of exceptional children, as defined in KRS 157.200, shall be
considered a change of educational placement if:
Page 14 of 18
XXXX 2/16/2025 12:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 468
1. The child is removed for more than ten (10) consecutive days during a
school year; or
2. The child is subjected to a series of removals that constitute a pattern
because the removals accumulate to more than ten (10) school days
during a school year and because of other factors, such as the length of
each removal, the total amount of time the child is removed, and the
proximity of removals to one another.
(b) The admissions and release committee shall meet to review the placement and
make a recommendation for continued placement or a change in placement
and determine whether regular suspension or expulsion procedures apply.
Additional evaluations shall be completed, if necessary.
(c) If the admissions and release committee determines that an exceptional child's
behavior is related to his or her disability, the child shall not be suspended any
further or expelled unless the current placement could result in injury to the
child, other children, or the educational personnel, in which case an
appropriate alternative placement shall be provided that will provide for the
child's educational needs and will provide a safe learning and teaching
environment for all. If the admissions and release committee determines that
the behavior is not related to the disability, the local educational agency may
pursue its regular suspension or expulsion procedure for the child, if the
behavior so warrants. However, educational services shall not be terminated
during a period of expulsion and during a suspension after a student is
suspended for more than a total of ten (10) days during a school year. A
district may seek temporary injunctive relief through the courts if the parent
and the other members of the admissions and release committee cannot agree
upon a placement and the current placement will likely result in injury to the
student or others.
Page 15 of 18
XXXX 2/16/2025 12:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 468
(9) Suspension or expulsion of primary school students shall be considered only in
exceptional cases where there are safety issues for the child, school personnel, or
others.
(10) Any action under this section related to students with disabilities shall be in
compliance with applicable federal law.
(11) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted or construed to preclude the
requirements contained in KRS 158.305 or 158.4416.
Section 3. KRS 158.155 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any school employee who knows or has reasonable cause to believe that a person
has made threats or plans of violence which are intended to target a school, school
personnel, or students or who knows that a firearm is present on school property in
violation of KRS 527.070 shall immediately cause a report to be made pursuant to
subsection (10) of this section.
(2) Any school employee shall immediately report pursuant to subsection (10) of this
section any act which the employee has a reasonable cause to believe has occurred
on school property or at a school-sponsored or sanctioned event involving:
(a) Assault resulting in [serious] physical injury;
(b) A sexual offense;
(c) Kidnapping;
(d) Assault with the use of a weapon;
(e) Possession of a firearm or deadly weapon in violation of the law;
(f) The use, possession, or sale of a controlled substance in violation of the law;
or
(g) Damage to property.
(3) Any school employee who receives information from a student or other person of
conduct which is required to be reported under subsection (1) or (2) of this section
shall report the conduct pursuant to subsection (10) of this section.
Page 16 of 18
XXXX 2/16/2025 12:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 468
(4) If a student has been adjudicated guilty of an offense specified in this subsection or
has been expelled from school for an offense specified in this subsection, prior to a
student's admission to any school, the parent, guardian, principal, or other person or
agency responsible for a student shall provide to the school a sworn statement or
affirmation indicating on a form provided by the Kentucky Board of Education that
the student has been adjudicated guilty or expelled from school attendance at a
public or private school in this state or another state for homicide, assault, or an
offense in violation of state law or school regulations relating to weapons, alcohol,
or drugs. The sworn statement or affirmation shall be sent to the receiving school
within five (5) working days of the time when the student requests enrollment in the
new school.
(5) If any student who has been expelled from attendance at a public or private school
in this state for homicide, assault, or an offense in violation of state law or school
regulations relating to weapons, alcohol, or drugs requests transfer of his records,
those records shall reflect the charges and final disposition of the expulsion
proceedings.
(6) If any student who is subject to an expulsion proceeding at a public or private
school in this state for homicide, assault, or an offense in violation of state law or
school regulations relating to weapons, alcohol, or drugs requests transfer of his
records to a new school, the records shall not be transferred until that proceeding
has been terminated and shall reflect the charges and any final disposition of the
expulsion proceedings.
(7) Neither the husband-wife privilege of KRE 504 nor any professional-client
privilege, including those set forth in KRE 506 and 507, shall be a ground for
refusing to make a report required under this section or for excluding evidence in a
judicial proceeding of the making of a report and of the conduct giving rise to the
making of a report. However, the attorney-client privilege of KRE 503 and the
Page 17 of 18
XXXX 2/16/2025 12:46 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 468
religious privilege of KRE 505 are grounds for refusing to make a report or for
excluding evidence as to the report and the underlying conduct.
(8) Nothing in this section shall be construed as to require self-incrimination.
(9) A person acting upon reasonable cause in the making of a report under this section
in good faith shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability that might
otherwise be incurred or imposed from:
(a) Making the report; and
(b) Participating in any judicial proceeding that resulted from the report.
(10) Notice required pursuant to this section shall be given to any law enforcement
agency created by the local board of education, and to:
(a) A local law enforcement agency not created by the local board of education;
or
(b) The Department of Kentucky State Police.[
(11) Any person who intentionally violates the provisions of this section shall be
guilty of a:
(a) Class B misdemeanor for the first offense;
(b) Class A misdemeanor for the second offense; and
(c) Class D felony for the third or subsequent offense.]
Section 4. KRS 158.990 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any member of a school board who votes to permit entrance to a school of any
child not eligible therefor under the provisions of KRS 158.030 shall be fined not
less than five dollars ($5) nor more than fifty dollars ($50).
(2) Any person required to report under KRS 158.155 who intentionally fails to report[
promptly or who refuses to make a report] shall be[is] guilty of a Class A
misdemeanor.
Page 18 of 18
XXXX 2/16/2025 12:46 PM Jacketed